Massachusetts, session 194th, H3152.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, in determining
the liability of any taxpayer for a tax, the department of revenue, the state treasurer nor any state
agency or constitutional officer shall contract with or employ any person, agent or firm who is
compensated in whole or in part by the state for services rendered on a contingent basis or any
other basis related to the amount of tax, interest, or penalty assessed against or collected from the
taxpayer.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the department
of revenue, the state treasurer or constitutional officer and any other state agency, in any contract
with or employment of any person, agent or firm to assist a local municipal official in the
performance of the local municipal assessor’s duties, may not compensate such person or firm, in
whole or in part, on a contingent fee basis or any other similar method that may impair the
assessor’s independence or the perception of the assessor’s independence by the public.
of 3

SECTION 3. Chapter 14 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 3A, the following new section:-
Section 3B. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the department of
revenue, the state treasurer or constitutional officer and any other state agency are expressly
prohibited from contracting with or employing any person, agent or firm on a contingent fee
basis or any other similar method that may impair an auditor’s independence.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the department
of revenue, the state treasurer and any other state agency or constitutional officer may not
contract with or employ a tax expert for the purposes of determining the tax liability of any
taxpayer for a tax or to defend the state department of revenue’s or state treasurer’s position
during the course of a dispute, mediation or litigation a person, agent or firm may not be
compensated, in whole or in part, on a contingent fee basis or any other similar method that may
impair the assessor’s independence or the perception of the assessor’s independence by the
public.
SECTION 5. Any regulations promulgated by any state agency or constitutional officer,
including the state treasurer and the department of revenue, authorizing the use of contingent
based contracts shall be repealed.
SECTION 6. Section 12 of Chapter 200A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting, after subsection (i), a new subsection:-
(j) Notwithstanding any special or general law to the contrary, the department of revenue,
the state treasurer, a constitutional officer, and any other state agency are expressly prohibited
of 3

from contracting with or employing any person, agent or firm on a contingent fee basis or any
other similar method that may impair an auditor’s independence.
SECTION 7. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to audits,
determinations of liability, assessments, and services of a tax expert contracted for on or after
that date. State agencies and constitutional officers shall not renew contingency fee based
contracts for these services after July 1, 2026. For contingency fee based contracts entered into
prior to July 1, 2026, state agencies and constitutional officers shall not assign further audits on a
contingency fee basis to an auditing firm under such contracts that meet all the following
conditions: (i) the contract would have been prohibited under this act had the contract been
entered into on or after July 1, 2026, and (ii) the contract allows the assignment of audits on a
discretionary basis by the state agency or constitutional officer.”
of 3